Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63-21-17.
Issuance of certificate of title; Department of Revenue to permanently maintain records of certificates of title, affidavits of affixation, manufacturers' certificates of origin, surrendered certificates of title, and affidavits of severance.

The Department of Revenue shall examine each application received and, when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a certificate of title, shall issue a certificate of title of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home on the form prescribed by the department.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of all certificates of title issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:

Under a distinctive title number assigned to the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home;

Under the vehicle identification number;

Under the name of the owner; and

In the discretion of the Department of Revenue, by any other method the department determines.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of each affidavit of affixation filed in accordance with subsections (3), (4) and (5) of Section 63-21-30. The record shall state the name and mailing address of each owner of the related manufactured home, the county of recordation, the date of recordation, and the book and page number of each book of records in which there has been recorded an affidavit of affixation under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 63-21-30, the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, and the manufacturer’s serial number or VIN of the manufactured home or mobile home, to the extent that such data exists, and any other information the Department of Revenue prescribes.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of each manufacturer’s certificate of origin submitted for the purpose of effectuating the retirement of title as provided in Section 63-21-30. The record shall state the name and mailing address of each owner of the manufactured home, the date the manufacturer’s certificate of origin was submitted, the county of recordation, the date of recordation, and the book and page number of each book of records in which there has been recorded an affidavit of affixation under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 63-21-30, the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, and the manufacturer’s serial number or VIN of the manufactured home or mobile home, to the extent that such data exists, and any other information the Department of Revenue prescribes.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of each certificate of title accepted for surrender as provided in subsection (5) of Section 63-21-30. The record shall state the name and mailing address of each owner of the manufactured home, the date the certificate of title was accepted for surrender, the county of recordation, the date of recordation, and the book and page number of each book of records in which there has been recorded an affidavit of affixation under subsections (1) and (2) of Section 63-21-30, the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, and the manufacturer’s serial number or VIN of the manufactured home or mobile home, to the extent that such data exists, and any other information the Department of Revenue prescribes.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of each affidavit of severance filed in accordance with subsection (6) of Section 63-21-30. The record shall state the name and mailing address of each owner of the related manufactured home, the county of recordation, the date of recordation, and the book and page number of each book of records in which there has been recorded an affidavit of severance under subsection (6) of Section 63-21-30, the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, and the manufacturer’s serial number or VIN of the manufactured home or mobile home, to the extent that such data exists, and any other information the Department of Revenue prescribes.

Records of affidavits of affixation, submitted manufacturer’s certificates of origin, surrendered certificates of title, and affidavits of severance shall be maintained permanently and be subject to public records request. The records of affidavits of affixation, submitted manufacturer’s certificates of origin, and surrendered certificates of title shall include a statement that the manufactured home is real property as provided in subsections (13) and (14) of Section 63-21-30.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-28; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 8; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-18.
Automated statewide motor vehicle title registration system.

The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall provide equipment for the operation and maintenance of the automated statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home registration system by the State Tax Commission.

The automated statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home registration system shall provide for computer terminals and printers, as authorized by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, to be located in the quantity necessary in each county seat tax collector’s office and any other office in which more than fifty percent (50%) of the motor vehicle registrations in the county are made.

All county tax collectors shall participate in such system as it applies to Chapter 19, Title 27; Chapter 51, Title 27; Chapter 21, Title 63; Mississippi Code of 1972, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the State Tax Commission. Such rules and regulations shall provide that counties which have an existing computer system designed to produce registration data may elect to use such existing system to communicate title/registration data to the commission through the computer furnished by the state as hereinabove provided in this section. If the State Tax Commission finds and determines that a county has failed to successfully establish or update title/registration data into the statewide vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title/registration system, either through use of equipment supplied by the State Tax Commission or through the interfacing between the network system and county computer equipment, the State Tax Commission shall thereafter cause to be withheld the county’s homestead exemption reimbursement monies, except for school districts and municipalities, until such time as the county has complied with this provision. Such monies as are withheld from a county for failure to comply with this provision shall be placed into a special escrow account to be established in the State Treasury. Once the county achieves compliance by successfully establishing or updating title/registration data into the statewide vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title/registration system, then the commission shall cause to be released to the county all funds held in escrow on the county’s behalf during the period of noncompliance. All interest earned shall accrue to the benefit of the county on any funds placed in an escrow account. Any cost involved in interfacing between existing county computer systems and the state-provided computer shall be paid by the county.

The computer terminals and printers placed in each county tax collector’s office may be utilized to provide additional computer functions as authorized by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

The State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants to the State Treasurer for the expenditures for the implementation and maintenance of the system upon requisitions signed by the Chairman of the State Tax Commission, as authorized by the Legislature.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the operation of the statewide motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title registration system shall be the responsibility of the State Tax Commission.

The State Tax Commission shall provide for the transfer of motor vehicle, manufactured housing and mobile home title and lien registration information to the commission by electronic means from banks and other lending institutions as provided in Section 63-21-18. The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall cooperate with the State Tax Commission in implementing the provisions of Section 63-21-18, and shall provide the State Tax Commission with whatever assistance the commission needs to carry out the provisions of Section 63-21-18.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 309, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 302; Laws, 1990, ch. 415, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-19.
Contents and effect of certificate of title; attachment, etc., of certificate.

Each certificate of title issued by the State Tax Commission shall contain:

The date issued;

The name and current address of the owner;

The names and addresses of the first two (2) lienholders in the order of priority as shown on the application, or if the application is based on a certificate of title as shown on the certificate;

The title number;

A description of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, including the following data, if applicable: year, make, model, vehicle identification number, type of body, number of cylinders, whether new or used, odometer reading, a statement which qualifies mileage according to the odometer disclosure certified by the transferor and, if a new vehicle, the date of the first sale of the vehicle for use; and

Any other data the State Tax Commission prescribes.

Unless security is furnished as provided in subsection (b) of Section 63-21-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, a distinctive certificate of title shall be issued for a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home last previously registered in another state or country the laws of which do not require that lienholders be named on a certificate of title to perfect their security interests. The certificate shall contain the legend “This vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home may be subject to an undisclosed lien” and may contain any other information the State Tax Commission prescribes. If no notice of a security interest in the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is received by the State Tax Commission within four (4) months from the issuance of the distinctive certificate of title, the State Tax Commission shall, upon application and surrender of the distinctive certificate, issue a certificate of title in ordinary form.

The certificate of title shall contain forms for assignment and warranty of title by the owner, and for assignment and warranty of title by a dealer, and may contain forms for applications for a certificate of title by a transferee, the naming of a lienholder and the assignment or release of the security interest of a lienholder.

A certificate of title issued by the State Tax Commission is prima facie evidence of the facts appearing on it.

A certificate of title for a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is not subject to garnishment, attachment, execution or other judicial process. However, this paragraph shall not prevent a lawful levy upon the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-30; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 10; Laws, 1986, ch. 328, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 369, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-21.
Delivery of certificate of title.

The certificate of title shall be mailed to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner. If the original certificate of title is delivered to a lienholder, a nontransferable duplicate certificate of title shall be mailed to the owner to serve as a permit for operation of the motor vehicle or use or occupancy of the manufactured home or mobile home.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-31; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 11; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-23.
Issuance of certificate of title where questions as to ownership of vehicle or existence of undisclosed security interests exist.

If the State Tax Commission is not satisfied as to the ownership of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or that there are no undisclosed security interests in it, the commission may accept the application but shall either:

Withhold issuance of a certificate of title until the applicant presents documents reasonably sufficient to satisfy the commission as to the applicant’s ownership of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and that there are no undisclosed security interests in it; or

As a condition of issuing a certificate of title, require the applicant or dealer to file with the commission a bond in the form prescribed by the commission and executed by the applicant or dealer and by a person authorized to conduct a surety business in this state, or require the application to be accompanied by the deposit of cash with the commission. The bond or cash shall be in an amount equal to one and one-half (1-1/2) times the value of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home as determined by the commission and conditioned to indemnify any prior owner and lienholder and any subsequent purchaser of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or person acquiring any security interest in it, and their respective successors in interest, against any expense, loss or damage, including reasonable attorney’s fees, by reason of the issuance of the certificates of title of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or on account of any defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the right, title and interest of the applicant in and to the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home. Any such interested person has a right of action to recover on the bond or cash for any breach of its conditions, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall not exceed the amount of the bond or cash. The bond or cash shall be returned at the end of three (3) years unless the commission has been notified of the pendency of an action to recover on the bond or cash or that the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home does not belong to the registered owner or that it is encumbered by an undisclosed lien.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-32; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 12; Laws, 1975, ch. 370; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-25.
Refusal to issue certificate of title.

The Department of Revenue shall refuse issuance of a certificate of title:

If any required fee is not paid;

If the department has reasonable grounds to believe that the applicant is not the owner of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, or that the application contains a false or fraudulent statement, or that the applicant has failed to furnish required information or documents or any additional information the department reasonably requires; or

If the certificate of title is to a manufactured home or mobile home with respect to which title has been retired to real property under Section 63-21-30 unless with respect to the same home title has been severed from real property pursuant to Section 63-21-30.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-33; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 13; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-27.
Replacement of lost, stolen, mutilated or destroyed certificates.

If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated or destroyed or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate, as shown by the records of the State Tax Commission, shall promptly make application for and may obtain a replacement upon furnishing information satisfactory to the commission. The replacement certificate of title shall contain the legend “This is a replacement certificate and may be subject to the rights of a person under the original certificate.” It shall be mailed to the lienholder named in it or, if none, to the owner.

The State Tax Commission shall not issue a new certificate of title to a transferee upon application made on replacement certificate until fifteen (15) days after receipt of the application.

A person recovering an original certificate of title for which a replacement has been issued shall promptly surrender the original certificate to the State Tax Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-34; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 14; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 66, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-21-29.
Issuance of distinctive certificate of title.

If the State Tax Commission is not satisfied that there are no undisclosed security interests created before August 9, 1968, in a previously registered vehicle, or created before July 1, 1999, in a previously registered manufactured home or mobile home, the commission may, in addition to the commission’s options under Section 63-21-27, issue a distinctive certificate of title of the vehicle containing the legend “This vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home may be subject to an undisclosed lien” and any other information the commission prescribes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-50; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 30; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1999.